Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB495.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 401(e)(1) of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 401. Qualifications Required to Secure Compensation.--Compensation shall be payable to any employe who 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 is or becomes unemployed, and who--* * *(e) (1) [Has] Except as provided in subsection (h), has been unemployed for a waiting period of one week.* * *(h) For a claim for a period of unemployment beginning after the effective date of this subsection, is unemployed due to a stoppage of work caused by a labor dispute: Provided, That the claimant shall not be provided benefits for a thirty-day period following a stoppage of work caused by a labor dispute other than a lockout.Section 2. Section 402(b) and (d) of the act are amended to read:Section 402. Ineligibility for Compensation.--An employe shall be ineligible for compensation for any week--* * *(b) In which his unemployment is due to voluntarily leaving work without cause of a necessitous and compelling nature, irrespective of whether or not such work is in "employment" as defined in this act: Provided, That a voluntary leaving work because of a disability if the employer is able to provide other suitable work, shall be deemed not a cause of a necessitous and compelling nature: And provided further, That no employe shall be deemed to be ineligible under this subsection where as a condition of continuing in employment such employe would be required to join or remain a member of a company union or to resign from or refrain from joining any bona fide labor organization, or to accept wages, hours or conditions of employment not desired by a majority of the employes in the establishment or the occupation, or would be denied the right of 20250SB0495PN0450 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 collective bargaining under generally prevailing conditions, and that in determining whether or not an employe has left his work voluntarily without cause of a necessitous and compelling nature, the department shall give consideration to the same factors, insofar as they are applicable, provided, with respect to the determination of suitable work under section four (t)[: And provided further, That the provisions of this subsection shall not apply in the event of a stoppage of work which exists because of a labor dispute within the meaning of subsection (d)]. Provided further, That no otherwise eligible claimant shall be denied benefits for any week in which his unemployment is due to exercising the option of accepting a layoff, from an available position pursuant to a labor-management contract agreement, or pursuant to an established employer plan, program or policy: Provided further, That a claimant shall not be disqualified for voluntarily leaving work, which is not suitable employment to enter training approved under section 236(a)(1) of the Trade Act of 1974: Provided further, That a claimant shall not be disqualified for voluntarily leaving work if the claimant left such work to accompany a spouse who is on active duty with the United States Armed Forces and is required to relocate due to permanent change of station orders, activation orders or unit deployment orders and such relocation would make it impractical or unreasonably difficult, as determined by the department, for the claimant to continue employment with the claimant's employer. For purposes of this subsection the term "suitable employment" means with respect to a claimant, work of a substantially equal or higher skill level than the claimant's past "adversely affected employment" (as defined in section 247 of the Trade Act of 1974), and wages for such work at not less 20250SB0495PN0450 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 than eighty per centum of the worker's "average weekly wage" (as defined in section 247 of the Trade Act of 1974).* * *[(d) In which his unemployment is due to a stoppage of work, which exists because of a labor dispute (other than a lock-out) at the factory, establishment or other premises at which he is or was last employed: Provided, That this subsection shall not apply if it is shown that (1) he is not participating in, or directly interested in, the labor dispute which caused the stoppage of work, and (2) he is not a member of an organization which is participating in, or directly interested in, the labor dispute which caused the stoppage of work, and (3) he does not belong to a grade or class of workers of which, immediately before the commencement of the stoppage, there were members employed at the premises at which the stoppage occurs, any of whom are participating in, or directly interested in, the dispute.]* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0495PN0450 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819